Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.092

Health care professionals to maintain proper credentials and educational standards—Standards for treatment.

Health care professionals providing treatment or services to crime victims shall maintain all proper credentials and educational standards as required by law, and be registered with the department of health. The crime victims' compensation program does not pay for experimental or controversial treatment. Treatment shall be evidence-based and curative.

[ 2011 c 346 s 504.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.